Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-872
Teacher or administrator; professional or labor organization; deduction from wages.

Any teacher or administrator employed by a school district who voluntarily participates in a professional or labor organization may authorize the withholding from his or her wages of an amount to be paid to the professional or labor organization. The school district shall make such deduction each month or pay period and pay the amount deducted to such professional or labor organization. The school district may charge an amount not to exceed the actual cost incurred by the school district for making such deductions.

Laws 1979, LB 53, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,101;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 497.